Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2704
Memorandum of understanding; contents.

Each memorandum of understanding required by section 79-2703 shall govern the use of school resource officers or security guards and shall include, but not be limited to, policies that:

(1) Require each school resource officer or security guard to attend a minimum of twenty hours of training focused on school-based law enforcement, including, but not limited to, coursework focused on school law, student rights, understanding special needs students and students with disabilities, conflict de-escalation techniques, ethics for school resource officers, teenage brain development, adolescent behavior, implicit bias training, diversity and cultural awareness, trauma-informed responses, and preventing violence in school settings;

(2) Require a minimum of one administrator in each elementary or secondary school where a school resource officer or security guard is assigned to attend a minimum of twenty hours of training focused on school-based law enforcement, including, but not limited to, coursework focused on school law, student rights, understanding special needs students and students with disabilities, conflict de-escalation techniques, ethics for school resource officers and security guards, teenage brain development, adolescent behavior, implicit bias training, diversity and cultural awareness, trauma-informed responses, and preventing violence in school settings;

(3) Ensure records are kept on each student referral for prosecution from a school resource officer in response to an incident occurring at school, on school grounds, or at a school-sponsored event and ensure that such records allow for analysis of related data and delineate:

(a) The reason for such referral; and

(b) Federally identified demographic characteristics of such student;

(4) Identify school policies that address when a parent or guardian will be notified or present, in a language that such parent or guardian understands, if a student is subjected to questioning or interrogation by a school official or by a school resource officer or security guard operating in conjunction with a school official;

(5) Identify the school or law enforcement agency policies that address under what circumstances a student will be advised of constitutional rights prior to being questioned or interrogated by a school official or by a school resource officer or security guard operating in conjunction with a school official;

(6) Identify the school policy required by section 79-262 that addresses the type or category of student conduct or actions that will be referred to law enforcement for prosecution and the type of student conduct or actions that will be resolved as a disciplinary matter by a school official and not subject to referral to law enforcement; and

(7) Identify a student and parent complaint process to express a concern or file a complaint about a school resource officer or security guard and the practices of such school resource officer or security guard with the law enforcement agency or security agency.

Laws 2019, LB390, § 4.